Hawaii statutes.
[§711-1106.6] Harassment by impersonation.
(1) A person commits the offense of harassment by impersonation if that
person poses as another person, without the express authorization of that
person, and makes or causes to be made, either directly or indirectly, a
transmission of any personal information of the person to another by any oral
statement, any written statement, or any statement conveyed by any electronic
means, with the intent to harass, annoy, or alarm any person.

(2) Harassment by impersonation is a
misdemeanor.

(3) For the purposes of this section:

"Personal information" means
information associated with an actual person that is a name, an address, a
telephone number, or an electronic mail address.

"Pose" means to falsely represent oneself,
directly or indirectly, as another person or persons. [L 2008, c 133, §1]

Cross References

Impersonating a public servant or law enforcement officer,
see §§710-1016, 710-1016.6, and 710-1016.7.

COMMENTARY ON §711-1106.6

Act 133, Session Laws 2008, added this section, creating the
misdemeanor offense of harassment by impersonation. Conference Committee
Report No. 27-08.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next